src/noun-fao-morph.txt
LEXICON h13 ! setur
h13e ;
h-flt13 ;

LEXICON h13e 
+N+Neu:%^EPH S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu:%^EPH S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt13
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h14 ! pistr
h14e ;
h-flt14 ;

LEXICON h14e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt14
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h15 ! tjaldur
h15e ;
h15f ;

LEXICON h15e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h15f
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

! Start here.
LEXICON h16 ! skýggj
h16e ;
h-flt16 ;

LEXICON h16e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu:%^JI S-N-SGD-i ;    !skýggi
+N+Neu: S-N-SGD ;          !skýggj
+N+Neu:%^GGDEL S-N-SGG-s ; !krýs

LEXICON h-flt16f
h-flt16 ;

LEXICON h-flt16
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h17 ! kriggj
h17e ;
h-flt17 ;

LEXICON h17e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu:%^JI S-N-SGD-i ;    !kríggi
+N+Neu: S-N-SGD ;          !kríggj
+N+Neu:%^GDEL S-N-SGG-s ;  !krígs

LEXICON h-flt17
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h18 ! týggi
h18e ;
h-flt18 ;

LEXICON h18e
+N+Neu: i-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: i-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt18
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h19 ! prógv
h19e ;
h-flt19 ;

LEXICON h19e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt19
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h20 ! búgv
h20e ;
h-flt20 ;

LEXICON h20e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGD-i ;
+N+Neu:%^GVDEL S-N-SGG-s ;

LEXICON h-flt20
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h21 ! plógv
h21e ;
h-flt21 ;

LEXICON h21e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt21
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h22 ! ber
h22e ;
h-flt22 ;

LEXICON h22e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt22
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h23 ! egg
h23e ;
h-flt23 ;

LEXICON h23e 
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt23
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h24 ! kvæði
h24e ;
h-flt24r ;

LEXICON h-flt24e
h24e ;

LEXICON h24e
+N+Neu: i-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGD-i ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt24r
+N+Neu: N-PLNA-i-ir ;
!          h-flt24 ; ! Ordinary pl
!+N+Neu:r N-PLNA ;   ! "Danish" r pl.
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h-flt24
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h25 ! merki
h25e ;
h-flt25 ;

LEXICON h25e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt25
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h26 ! tiðindi
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h27 ! systkin
h27e ;
h-flt27 ;

LEXICON h27e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt27
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h28 ! bakari
h28e ;
h-flt28 ;

LEXICON h28e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;  !bakarí
+N+Neu: S-N-SGD ;   ! bakarí
+N+Neu: S-N-SGD-i ; ! bakaríi
+N+Neu: S-N-SGG-s ; ! bakarís

LEXICON h-flt28
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h29 ! kamar
h29e ;
h-flt29 ;

LEXICON h29e 
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt29 
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h30 ! summar
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h31 ! nummar
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h32 ! høvd
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h33 ! høvur
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h34 ! fæ
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h42
+N+Neu: FINAL ; !check.


! =============== !
! Case inflection !
! =============== !

! This is the second layer. Here we do the indefinite
! forms.

! Masculine forms
! ---------------

! Weak case suffixes.
 
LEXICON W-M-SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF-N-SGm-indef ;
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF-N-SGm-def ;

LEXICON W-M-SGACC
+Sg+Acc:%>a   DF-A-SGm ; ! risan

LEXICON W-M-SGDAT
+Sg+Dat:%>a  DF-D-SGm ;

LEXICON W-M-SGDAT-mixed !felagnum
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>a  FINAL ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>num FINAL ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%>num R ;

LEXICON W-M-SGGEN
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a FINAL ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans FINAL ; !XXX ans?
+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans R ;


! Plural

LEXICON W-M-PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLNOM-UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLACC
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLACC-UR
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLDAT
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON W-M-PLGEN
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;



! Strong case suffixes
! --------------------



LEXICON DF-NA-SGm-S ! luður
+Sg+Nom:%> DF-N-SGm ;
+Sg+Acc: DF-A-SGm-indef ;
+Sg+Acc:%> DF-A-SGm-def ;


! Nominative Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>ur DF-N-SGm-indef ;
+Sg+Nom:%>uri DF-N-SGm-def ;

LEXICON S-M-SGNOM-NULL
+Sg+Nom:%> DF-N-SGm ;
+Sg+Nom:%> DF-N-SGm ;


! Accusative Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGACC
+Sg+Acc: DF-A-SGm-indef ;
+Sg+Acc:%>i DF-A-SGm-def ; !sandin


! Dative Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGDAT
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF-D-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGDAT-2
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF-D-SGm ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:%^GVDEL%>num #;

LEXICON S-M-SGDAT-NULL
+Sg+Dat:%> DF-D-SGm ;

! Genitive Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>s DF-G-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGGEN-NULL
+Sg+Gen:%> DF-G-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGGEN-AR
+Sg+Gen:%>ar DF-G-SGm ;

! Plural forms

! Nominative

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-IR
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-NULL
+Pl+Nom:    DF-N-PLm-indef ;
+Pl+Nom:%>i DF-N-PLm-def ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-NULL-IR
+Pl+Nom:     DF-N-PLm-indef ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF-N-PLm-def ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-NULL-I-IR
+Pl+Nom:     DF-N-PLm-indef ;
+Pl+Nom:%>i DF-N-PLm-def ; !SUB Bible
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF-N-PLm-def ;


! Accusative

LEXICON S-M-PLACC
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-IR
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-UR
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-NULL
+Pl+Acc:    DF-A-PLm-indef ;
+Pl+Acc:%>i DF-A-PLm-def ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-NULL-IR
+Pl+Acc:     DF-A-PLm-indef ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-A-PLm-def ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-NULL-I-IR
+Pl+Acc:     DF-A-PLm-indef ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-A-PLm-def ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-A-PLm-def ;

!LEXICON S-M-PLACC-NULL-I
!+Pl+Acc:%> DF-A-PLm-I ;


! Dative

LEXICON S-M-PLDAT
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON S-M-PLDATm ! skóm
+Pl+Dat:%> DF-D-PL ;

! Genitive

LEXICON S-M-PLGEN
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;
+Pl+Gen:%>a R ; !XXX


! Feminine forms
! --------------

! Singular case suffixes.

! Nominative

LEXICON W-F-SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>a DF-N-SGf-W ;

LEXICON S-F-SGNAD
+Sg+Nom:%> DF-N-SGf-S ;
+Sg+Acc:%> DF-A-SGf-S ;
+Sg+Dat:%> DF-D-SGf-S ;

! Oblique

LEXICON W-F-SGOBL
+Sg+Acc:%>u DF-A-SGf-W ;
+Sg+Dat:%>u DF-D-SGf-W ;
+Sg+Gen:%>u DF-G-SGf-W ;

LEXICON S-F-SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>ar DF-G-SGf-S ;

LEXICON S-F-SGGEN-NULL
+Sg+Gen:%> DF-G-SGf-S ;




! Plural case suffixes

LEXICON F-PLNA-UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLNA-IR
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLNA-AR
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLNA-NULL
+Pl+Nom:%> DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%> DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLDAT 
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON F-PLGEN 
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;


! Neuter forms
! ------------

LEXICON S-N-SGNA
+Sg+Nom:%> DF-NA-SGn ;
+Sg+Acc:%> DF-NA-SGn ;

LEXICON S-N-SGDG
+Sg+Dat:%> DF-D-SGn ;
+Sg+Gen:%> DF-G-SGn ;

LEXICON S-N-SGD
+Sg+Dat:%> DF-D-SGn ;

LEXICON S-N-SGG
+Sg+Gen:%> DF-G-SGn ;

LEXICON S-N-SGDG-is
S-N-SGD-i ;
S-N-SGG-s ;

LEXICON S-N-SGD-i
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF-D-SGn ;

LEXICON S-N-SGG-s
+Sg+Gen:%>s DF-G-SGn ;

LEXICON S-N-SGG-is
+Sg+Gen:%>is DF-G-SGn ;

LEXICON i-N-SGNA
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF-NA-SGn-indef ;
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF-NA-SGn-def ;
+Sg+Acc:%>i DF-NA-SGn-indef ;
+Sg+Acc:%>i DF-NA-SGn-def ;

LEXICON i-N-SGDG-is
+Sg+Gen:%>is DF-G-SGn ;
+Sg+Dat:%>is DF-D-SGn ;

LEXICON N-PLNA-u-ur 
+Pl+Nom:%>u DF-NA-PLn-W ;
+Pl+Acc:%>u DF-NA-PLn-W ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ur FINAL ;
+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ur FINAL ;

LEXICON N-PLNA-i-ir 
+Pl+Nom:%>i DF-NA-PLn-W ;
+Pl+Acc:%>i DF-NA-PLn-W ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir FINAL ;
+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ir FINAL ;

LEXICON N-PLNA 
+Pl+Nom:%> DF-NA-PLn ;
+Pl+Acc:%> DF-NA-PLn ;


LEXICON N-PLD
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON N-PLG
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;

LEXICON N-PLG-na
+Pl+Gen:%>na DF-G-PL ;

! Common cases

LEXICON DF-D-PL
+Indef:m FINAL ;
+Def:num FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-G-PL
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:nna FINAL ;







! =================== !
! Definite inflection !
! =================== !

! This is the third layer. Here we do the definite forms.


! Masculine forms
! ---------------

! Masc def sg

LEXICON DF-N-SGm
   DF-N-SGm-indef ;
:i DF-N-SGm-def ;

LEXICON DF-N-SGm-indef 
+Indef: FINAL ; !risi

LEXICON DF-N-SGm-def 
+Def:%>n FINAL ; ! risin

LEXICON DF-A-SGm
DF-A-SGm-indef ;
DF-A-SGm-def ;

LEXICON DF-A-SGm-indef 
+Indef: FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-A-SGm-def 
+Def:%>n FINAL ; ! risan, sandin

LEXICON DF-D-SGm
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>num FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-G-SGm
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>ins FINAL ;
           R ;


! Masc def pl

LEXICON DF-N-PLm
DF-N-PLm-indef ;
DF-N-PLm-def ;


LEXICON DF-N-PLm-indef
+Indef:  FINAL  ; 

LEXICON DF-N-PLm-def
+Def:%>nir FINAL ; ! no -i-

LEXICON DF-A-PLm
DF-A-PLm-indef ;
DF-A-PLm-def ;

LEXICON DF-A-PLm-indef
+Indef: FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-A-PLm-def
+Def:%>nar FINAL ; ! no -i



! Feminine forms
! ---------------

LEXICON DF-N-SGf-W
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>n FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-N-SGf-S
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>in FINAL ;


LEXICON DF-A-SGf-W
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>na FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-A-SGf-S
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>ina FINAL ;


LEXICON DF-D-SGf-W
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>ni FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-D-SGf-S
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>ini FINAL ;


LEXICON DF-G-SGf-W
+Indef:      FINAL ;
+Def:%>nnar  FINAL ;
             R ;

LEXICON DF-G-SGf-S
+Indef:      FINAL ;
+Def:%>innar FINAL ;
             R ;

LEXICON DF-NA-PLf
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>nar FINAL ;


! Neuter forms
! ---------------

LEXICON DF-NA-SGn
   DF-NA-SGn-indef ;
:i DF-NA-SGn-def ;

LEXICON DF-NA-SGn-indef
+Indef: FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-NA-SGn-def
+Def:%>ð FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-D-SGn
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>num FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-G-SGn
+Def:%>ins FINAL ;
g-indef-r ;

LEXICON g-indef-r
+Indef:    FINAL ;
           R ;

LEXICON DF-G-SGn-a
+Def:%>ns FINAL ;
g-indef-r ;

LEXICON DF-NA-PLn ! orðini
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>ini FINAL ;

LEXICON DF-NA-PLn-W ! eyguni, hjørtuni
+Indef: FINAL ;
+Def:%>ni FINAL ;
